California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 provider to work a threshold number of hours, eligibility shall be determined based on the aggregate number of monthly hours worked between IHSS and waiver personal care services.

(e) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 35, Sec. 34.   (AB 1811)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.98.

(a) For a beneficiary diagnosed with cancer and accepted into a phase I, phase II, phase III, or phase IV clinical trial for cancer or for any other qualifying clinical trial, as defined by Section 1396d(gg)(2) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the Medi-Cal program shall provide coverage for all routine patient care costs related to the clinical trial if the beneficiary’s treating physician, who is providing covered health care services to the beneficiary under the Medi-Cal program, recommends participation in the clinical trial after determining that participation in the clinical trial has a meaningful potential to benefit the beneficiary. For purposes of this section, a clinical trial’s endpoints shall not be defined exclusively to test toxicity, but shall have a therapeutic
 intent.

(b) (1) In accordance with Section 1396d(gg)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, “routine patient care costs” means the costs associated with the provision of health care services, including drugs, items, devices, and services that would otherwise be covered under the Medi-Cal program if those drugs, items, devices, and services were not provided in connection with an approved clinical trial program, including:

(A) Health care services typically provided absent a clinical trial.

(B) Health care services required solely for the provision of the investigational drug, item, device, or service.

(C) Health care services required for the clinically appropriate monitoring of the investigational item or service.

(D) Health care services provided for the prevention of complications arising from the provision of the investigational drug, item, device, or service.

(E) Health care services needed for the reasonable and necessary care arising from the provision of the investigational drug, item, device, or service, including the diagnosis or treatment of the complications.

(2) For purposes of this section, “routine patient care costs” does not include the costs associated with the provision of any of the following:

(A) Drugs or devices that have not been approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration and that are associated with the clinical trial.

(B) Services other than health care services, such
 as travel, housing, companion expenses, and other nonclinical expenses, that a beneficiary may require as a result of the treatment being provided for purposes of the clinical trial, except as required under the Medicaid Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a et seq.).

(C) Any item or service that is provided solely to satisfy data collection and analysis needs and that is not used in the clinical management of the patient.

(D) Health care items or services that, except for the fact that they are being provided in a clinical trial, are not otherwise covered by the Medi-Cal program.

(E) Health care services customarily provided by the research sponsors free of charge for any beneficiary in the trial.

(c) The treatment shall be provided in a qualifying clinical
 trial, which means a clinical trial, in any clinical phase of development, that is conducted in relation to the prevention, detection, or treatment of any serious or life-threatening disease or condition and is described in Section 1396d(gg)(2)(A) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) This section does not prohibit the Medi-Cal program from restricting coverage for clinical trials to participating hospitals and physicians in California unless the protocol for the clinical trial is not provided for at a California hospital or by a California physician.

(e) The provision of services when required by this section shall not, in itself, give rise to liability on the part of the Medi-Cal program.

(f) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained, and federal
 financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(g) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become effective on July 1, 2022.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 103.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.985.

For services provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9, Section 14499.5, or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 101525) to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 101825), inclusive, of Part 4 of Division 101 of the Health and Safety Code, the cost for services defined in Section 1370.6 of the Health and Safety Code and Sections 14087.11 and 14132.98 of this code shall be provided by state-only funds if federal financial participation is not available.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14132.99 (as amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 664, Sec. 237) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 615.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.99.

(a) For the purposes of this section, “facility residents” means individuals who are currently residing in a nursing facility and whose care is paid for by Medi-Cal either with or without a long-term care patient liability. The term “facility residents” also includes individuals who are hospitalized and who are or will be waiting for transfer to a nursing facility.

(b) For those patients who are in acute care hospitals and who are pending placement in a nursing facility, the department shall expedite the processing of waiver applications in order to divert
 hospital discharges from nursing facilities into the community.

(c) The Nursing Facility/Acute Hospital Transition and Diversion Waiver shall include the following services:

(1) One-time community transition services as defined and allowed by the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, including, but not limited to, security deposits that are required to obtain a lease on an apartment or home, essential furnishings, and moving expenses required to occupy and use a community domicile, set-up fees, or deposits for utility or service access, including, but not limited to, telephone, electricity, and heating, and health and safety assurances, including, but not limited to, pest eradication, allergen control, or one-time cleaning prior to occupancy. These costs shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(2) Habilitation services, as defined in Section 1915(c)(5) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)(5)), and in attachment 3-d to the July 25, 2003, State Medicaid Directors Letter re Olmstead Update No. 3, to mean services designed to assist individuals in acquiring, retaining, and improving the self-help, socialization, and adaptive skills necessary to reside successfully in home- and community-based settings.

(d) (1) (A) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 12300.4, the department shall grant an exemption, as described in paragraph (2), to a provider of an applicant or participant of the Nursing Facility/Acute Hospital Transition and Diversion Waiver or the In-Home Operations Waiver, or their successors, who was enrolled in either waiver on January 31, 2016, and whose medical or behavioral needs require that the services to the
 applicant or participant be provided by the requested provider, if any of the following circumstances exists:

(i) The provider lives in the same home as the waiver applicant or participant, even if the provider is not a family member.

(ii) The provider currently provides care to the waiver participant, and has done so for two or more years continuously.

(iii) The waiver applicant or participant is unable to find a local caregiver who speaks the same language as the applicant or participant, resulting in the applicant or participant being unable to direct their own care.

(B) For a waiver participant who enrolls in either waiver after January 31, 2016, the department shall grant a provider an exemption from the workweek requirements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 12300.4 on a case-by-case basis pursuant to paragraph (5).

(2) A provider of in-home supportive services or waiver personal care services who is granted an exemption pursuant to paragraph (1) may work up to a total of 12 hours per day, and up to 360 hours per month combined for the in-home supportive services and waiver personal care services that they provide, not to exceed each waiver participant’s monthly authorized hours.

(3) On a one-time basis upon implementation of this paragraph, the department shall mail an informational notice and an exemption request form to all providers who may be eligible for an exemption pursuant to this subdivision and to the waiver participants to whom the providers provide services.

(4) At the time of initial application, and at least annually, the department shall inform all waiver applicants or participants whose providers may be eligible for an exemption pursuant to this subdivision and their providers about the exemptions and the application process.

(5) (A) The department shall review the requests for consideration for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) pursuant to a process developed by the department with input from stakeholders. The department shall
 consider whether the waiver applicant or participant meets the criteria described in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) in making its determination.

(B) Within 30 days of receiving an application for an exemption described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) from a provider and from a waiver applicant or participant on behalf of a provider, the department shall mail a written notification letter to the provider and the waiver applicant or participant for whom the provider provides services of its approval or denial of the exemption. If the department denies the exemption, the department shall also explain in the notification letter the reason for the denial. The department shall use a standardized notification letter, developed by the department in consultation with stakeholders, for purposes of providing the notification letter that is required by this subparagraph.

(6) The
 department shall record the number of requests for exemptions that are received and the number of requests approved or denied. These numbers shall be posted no later than every three months on the department’s internet website.

(e) The department shall implement this section only to the extent it can demonstrate fiscal neutrality within the overall department budget, and federal fiscal neutrality as required under the terms of the federal waiver, and only if the department has obtained the necessary approvals and receives federal financial participation from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 42, Sec. 147.   (AB 118)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.991.

(a) When renewing the Nursing Facility/Acute Hospital Transition and Diversion Waiver, as authorized by subdivision (t) of Section 14132, the director may take the following actions, among others:

(1) Contract with one or more organizations, referred to as a care management contractor, qualified to provide or arrange for delivery of care management and waiver services, including, but not limited to, personal needs assessments, and arranging for services available through public and private agencies, including services available under the waiver, for the waiver participants and applicants. The contract with the care management contractor, the care management contract, may require the care management contractor or their subcontractor, or both,
 to do all of the following, among other things:

(A) Provide, arrange for, or subcontract with community-based providers for the provision of, waiver services to waiver participants.

(B) Recognize program and service linkages, coordinate service delivery mechanisms and promote prevention of avoidable institutional placement, emergency room visits or inpatient hospital stays, or both, and coordination between health, social, and long-term services and supports by person-centered care planning.

(C) Provide or arrange for, care management to each waiver participant to stabilize their health care, and provide access to home- and community-based services, including managing and anticipating episodes of medical crisis in which transitional care management is needed.

(D) Carry out the waiver’s person-centered model of care, pursuant to the requirements set forth in Sections 441.720, 441.725, and 441.540 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(E) Submit all information and reports required by the department, including, but not limited to, annual financial statements in the timeframe specified by the department.

(F) Pay any providers of waiver services who are not directly employed by or contracted with the care management contractor no less than the rates specified in the waiver or the department’s fee schedule, whichever is less, for the provider type.

(G) Bill the department, at the rate established by the state, for all services the care management contractor provides to waiver participants, directly or through a subcontractor or other direct service
 provider.

(H) Comply with the requirements of the waiver, including any other requirements established by the department regarding waiver operations, including, but not limited to, requirements regarding care coordination. These requirements may be set forth in the care management contract, care management manual, all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins or policy letters, or similar instructions.

(2) Propose that the waiver provide for achievement of annual cost neutrality in the aggregate to allow enrollment and authorization of waiver services based on the medical necessity of the waiver services on a case-by-case basis.

(3) Expand the number of waiver slots up to 5,000 additional slots, the director may seek federal approval to amend the waiver to add additional slots or make changes to the
 waiver model with approval from the Department of Finance.

(4) Require care management contractors to enroll at least 60 percent of all total annual enrollments from either of the following:

(A) Hospital, nursing facility, or other institutional settings assisting members with transitions back to the home or community, or both, setting.

(B) Individuals who had been continuously receiving in home care services, of the type offered under the waiver, under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnosis, and Treatment State Plan benefit, California Children Services or Pediatric Palliative Care programs for children, for at least the prior three months but have at the time of transition exceeded the age limit for that benefit.

(5) If the director determines
 that the care management contractor is not fiscally solvent, or is in danger of becoming fiscally insolvent, the director has the option to immediately terminate the contract with the care management contractor.

(6) Terminate or refuse to renew, in whole or in part, a care management contract when the director determines that the action is necessary to protect the health of the beneficiaries or funds appropriated to the Medi-Cal program.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(c) In order to
 achieve maximum cost savings the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(d) The department shall implement this section only to the extent it can demonstrate federal cost neutrality as required under the terms of the waiver, and only to the extent any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 52, Sec. 49.   (SB 97)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.993.

(a) This section applies to the Home- and Community-Based Alternatives Waiver (HCBA), the Assisted Living Waiver (ALW), and, to the extent that the dependent child or spouse of an active duty military service member is deemed eligible for the Medi-Cal program, the Home- and Community-Based Services for the Developmentally Disabled (HCBS-DD) 1915(c) waiver programs, pursuant to state law and Section 1915(c) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396n(c)).

(b) (1) If a dependent child or spouse of an active duty military service member
 is currently included on the waiting list for a waiver program specified in subdivision (a) and transfers out of state with the military service member on official military orders, the dependent child or spouse shall retain their place on the waiting list for the applicable waiver program if the child or spouse
 subsequently reestablishes residence in this state. The dependent child’s or spouse’s place on the waiting list shall advance as the waiting list advances during the time they are out of the state.

(A) In order for the place on the waiting
 list to be saved after the dependent child or spouse leaves the state, the dependent child or spouse shall notify the department or its designee that they are leaving the state due to the military service member’s transfer orders and that they are requesting to remain on the waiver program’s waiting list.

(B) While the dependent child or spouse resides out of state and is in the first place on the waiver program’s waiting list, and has not informed the department or its designee that the military service member has received official military orders to relocate back to the state, waiver applicants with places farther down the waiting list shall continue to be processed for intake into the waiver program without regard to the dependent child’s or spouse’s place on the waiting list.

(C) If a dependent child or spouse who is on the waiver program’s waiting list informs the department
 or its designee that the military service member has received official military orders to return to the state and that the dependent child or spouse would like to enroll in the waiver program, the department or its designee shall take action on the dependent child’s or spouse’s waiver program application in accordance with their place on the waiver program’s waiting list.

(2) If a dependent child or spouse of an active duty military service member enrolled in a waiver program specified in subdivision (a) transfers out of state
 with the military service member on official military orders, and then returns to the state with the military service member on official military orders, the dependent child or spouse shall be reenrolled in the applicable waiver program if there is an open slot in the waiver program, or shall be placed in the first place on the waiver program’s waiting list if there is no open slot in the waiver program, subject to the dependent child or spouse meeting all of the following conditions:

(A) The dependent child or spouse reestablishes residence in this state.

(B) The dependent child or spouse submits an application for enrollment in the waiver program and is found to be eligible for the applicable waiver program.

(i) If no more than three years have passed since the dependent child or spouse left the waiver program, they may apply for reenrollment in the waiver program using an abbreviated waiver program enrollment form developed by the department.

(ii) If more than three years have passed since the dependent child or spouse
 left the waiver program, they shall apply for reenrollment in the waiver program using the standard waiver program enrollment form for that waiver program.

(iii) The dependent child or spouse shall follow the regular Medi-Cal eligibility and enrollment processes to obtain Medi-Cal enrollment.

(c) An individual applying for a waiver program specified in subdivision (a) who is a dependent child or spouse of an active duty military service member and is residing out of
 state with that military service member may submit the individual’s application
 to enroll in that waiver program as soon as the military service member receives official military orders to transfer to this state and before moving to this state. A copy of the order shall be submitted with the application for the Medi-Cal program and the applicable waiver program. The department or its designee may work with the dependent child or spouse, or their family, prior to their actual relocation to the state in order to evaluate the waiver program application with the goal of having medically necessary waiver program services in place as soon as possible when the family relocates to the state.

(d) (1) This section is not intended to authorize the provision of services to a dependent child or spouse of an active duty military service member through a waiver program specified in subdivision (a) while the dependent child or spouse is transferred to, and living, out of state with the military service member, or has not yet transferred to this state. Waiver program services provided to a dependent child or spouse under this section shall only be provided upon their establishing residence in this state and enrolling in Medi-Cal and the waiver program.

(2) This section is not intended to prevent another individual from receiving services through a waiver program described in subdivision (a) due to lack of space in the applicable waiver program on the sole basis that a dependent child or spouse described in this section is placed on the waiting list for that
 waiver program while the dependent child or spouse is transferred to, and living, out of state with the military service member, or has not yet transferred to this state.

(e) For purposes of this section, “dependent child” means an individual, whether a minor or an adult, who is a dependent of a parent or guardian.

(f) (1) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals have been obtained and that federal financial participation is available.

(2) The department
 may seek amendments to the waiver programs specified in subdivision (a), or take other action, as necessary to implement this section.

(3) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, in whole or in part, by means of letters or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 846, Sec. 1.   (SB 289)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.994.

A Medi-Cal managed care plan, as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 14184.101, shall cover COVID-19 screening, testing, immunizations, and therapeutics in accordance with applicable statutes, regulations, all plan letters, the Medi-Cal provider manual, Medi-Cal managed care plan contracts with the department pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 14200), and other guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 21, Sec. 106.   (AB 116)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132.995.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, vaccines and immunizations are covered in accordance with a recommendation from the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, the American Academy of Pediatrics, the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists, the American Academy of Family Physicians or any modification or supplement to that recommendation adopted pursuant to Section 120164 of the Health and Safety Code, with respect to the individual involved.

(b) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and not otherwise jeopardized, and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 105, Sec. 61.   (AB 144)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

14132aa.

(a) Services provided by facilities licensed as congregate living health facilities to individuals diagnosed as having acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS), are a covered benefit under this chapter, subject to utilization controls.

(b) Congregate living health facilities shall be reimbursed for services covered by this section at a rate set by the department and the provision of those services shall be subject to audit.

(c) This section shall be operative
 only to the extent that federal medicaid financial participation is made available pursuant to Subchapter XIX (commencing with Section 1396) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1221, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.

Utilization controls that may be applied to the services set forth in Section 14132 which are subject to utilization controls shall be limited to:

(a) Prior authorization, which is approval by a department consultant, of a specified service in advance of the rendering of that service based upon a determination of medical necessity. Prior authorization includes authorization for multiple services which are requested and granted on the basis of an extended treatment plan where there is a need for continuity in the treatment of a chronic or extended condition.

(b) Postservice prepayment audit, which is review for medical necessity and program coverage after service was rendered but before payment is made. Payment may be withheld or reduced if the service rendered was not a covered benefit, deemed medically unnecessary or inappropriate. Nothing in this subdivision shall supersede the claims processing deadlines provided by Section 14104.3.

(c) Postservice postpayment audit, which is review for medical necessity and program coverage after service was rendered and the claim paid. The department may take appropriate steps to recover payments made if subsequent investigation uncovers evidence that the claim should not have been paid.

(d) Limitation on number of services, which means certain services may be restricted as to number within a specified time frame.

(e) Review of services pursuant to Professional Standards Review Organization agreements entered into in accordance with Section 14104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.01.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the director or his or her designee may apply prior authorization by designing a sampling methodology that will result in a generally acceptable audit standard for approval of a treatment authorization request (TAR), or a class of TARs. The director or his or her designee shall determine the applicable sampling methodology based upon health care industry standards and discussions with applicable Medi-Cal providers or their representatives. This sampling methodology shall be implemented by no later than July 1, 2005, and an outline of the methodology shall be provided to the fiscal and policy committees of both houses of the Legislature. It is the intent of the
 Legislature for the department to review the sampling methodology on an ongoing basis and update the methodology as applicable on a periodic basis in order to keep abreast of health care industry trends and the need to manage an efficient and effective Medi-Cal program.

(b) The department shall pursue additional means to improve and streamline the treatment authorization request process including, where applicable, those identified by independent analyses such as the July 2003 report by the California HealthCare Foundation entitled Medi-Cal Treatment Authorizations and Claims Processing: Improving Efficiency and Access to Care, and those identified by Medi-Cal providers. It is the Legislature’s intent that any identified improvements be cost beneficial to the state and to the Medi-Cal program as a whole.

(c) (1) By July 1, 2016, or a subsequent date determined by the department, treatment authorization requests, excluding treatment authorization requests submitted by dental providers enrolled in the Medi-Cal Dental program, shall be submitted in an electronic format determined by the department and shall be submitted via the department’s Internet Web site or other electronic means designated by the department. The department may implement this requirement in phases.

(2) The department shall consider the capacity of independent sole practitioners, small independent provider-owned clinics, and rural providers to comply with the requirements of this section, and shall implement the electronic submission process in a
 manner that offers these providers both of the following:

(A) Reasonable time to establish the infrastructure necessary for the generation of electronic treatment authorization requests.

(B) An opportunity to participate in education and training regarding the generation and submission of electronic treatment authorization requests provided by the department or its agents.

(3) The department shall designate an alternate format for submitting requests for authorization of services when the department’s
 Internet Web site or other electronic means designated in paragraph (1) are unavailable due to a system disruption.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may, without taking regulatory action, implement, interpret, or make specific, this section and any applicable waivers and state plan amendments by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations by July 1, 2017, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The department shall consult with interested parties and appropriate
 stakeholders in implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 849, Sec. 3.   (SB 1457)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.05.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a request for a treatment authorization received by the department shall be reviewed for medical necessity only.

(b) Any claim for a service that is authorized pursuant to a treatment authorization request that qualifies for approval under the requirements established by the department in regulations shall be reduced in accordance with Section 14115.

(c) If a
 provider does not agree with the decision on a treatment authorization request, the provider may appeal the decision pursuant to procedures set forth in regulations adopted by the department.

(d) Providers shall comply with the administrative remedies available to them prior to seeking a judicial remedy with respect to a decision of the department on a treatment authorization request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 93, Sec. 95.   Effective July 7, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.07.

(a) A doctor of podiatric medicine shall not be required to submit prior authorization for podiatric services rendered in either an outpatient or inpatient basis if a physician and surgeon providing the same services would not be required to submit prior authorization to the department.

(b) A doctor of podiatric medicine acting within their scope of practice and providing services pursuant to subdivision (a) is subject to the same Medi-Cal billing and services policies as required for a physician and surgeon, including, but not limited to, a maximum numerical service limitation in any one calendar month.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 433, Sec. 2.   (AB 678)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.1.

(a) The director shall determine which of the utilization controls in Section 14133 shall be applied to any specific service or group of services which are subject to utilization controls. Each utilization control shall be reasonably related to the purpose for which it is imposed.

(b) Except as provided in Sections 14103.6 and 14133.15, neither prior authorization nor the limitation specified in subdivision (d) of Section 14133 shall be required for the first two services per month which are included among the services listed in subdivision (a) of Section 14132, or
 for the first two drug prescriptions purchased during any one month, provided that the prescription drugs are included in the Medi-Cal Drug Formulary and the prescription otherwise conforms to applicable formulary requirements.

(c) The director shall, after a determination of cost benefit, modify or eliminate the requirement of prior authorization as a control for treatment, supplies, or equipment which costs less than one hundred dollars ($100), except for prescribed drugs, provided that the requirement of prior authorization for treatment, supplies, or equipment may be reinstituted upon a finding by the department that the elimination of the requirement has resulted in unnecessary utilization, and upon notice to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee 30 days prior to the reinstitution of the requirement of prior authorization. Modification of the utilization controls may include establishing prior authorization review thresholds at levels
 other than one hundred dollars ($100) if indicated by the cost-benefit analysis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 775, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.10.

(a) Where it is expected to be cost-effective, the director may, in conducting Medi-Cal acute care inpatient hospital utilization control, establish a program of aggressive case management of elective, nonemergency acute care hospital admissions for the purpose of reducing both the numbers and duration of acute care hospital stays by Medi-Cal beneficiaries.

(b) In conducting the case management program, the department may, conduct daily reviews to determine the need for
 additional days of inpatient care.

(c) In undertaking this case management program, the director may enter into contracts, on a bid or nonbid basis, for the purposes of obtaining the necessary expertise to train and educate utilization control staff in case management concepts, principles and techniques, identify and recommend cost-effective therapies, services and technology as alternatives to elective acute care hospitalization or to directly provide the case management and diversion services.

(d) In order to achieve maximum cost savings the Legislature hereby determines that an expedited contract process for contracts under this section is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this article may be on a nonbid basis, and shall be exempt from the provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. Contracts shall have no
 force and effect unless approved by the Department of Finance.

(e) The department shall seek all federal waivers necessary to allow for federal financial participation under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 722, Sec. 122.   Effective September 15, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.12.

(a) The director shall apply utilization controls to continuous skilled nursing care services provided pursuant to the pilot program established under Section 14495.10, including, but not limited to, prior authorization and monitoring by the department. Prior authorization shall ensure that continuous skilled nursing care services are medically necessary, and that the provision of continuous skilled nursing care will avoid a transfer to, or placement at, a higher level of service. Monitoring shall be conducted by the
 department including, but not limited to, evaluation of quality of life, health, safety, and well-being of the beneficiary, and quality, efficiency, and cost effectiveness of the continuous skilled nursing care services. The department shall consult with the State Department of Developmental Services and regional centers to design monitoring efforts.

(b) Payment of the reimbursement rates established pursuant to Section 14110.55 shall be subject to all billing criteria of the Medi-Cal program and the utilization controls set forth in this section.

(c) This section shall become operative only if the federal waiver identified under Section 14495.10 is approved by the federal Health Care Financing Administration. The director shall maintain a record of the satisfaction of this condition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 845, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.   Conditionally operative by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.14.

The criteria that the department shall use to identify providers to be placed on prior authorization for noninvasive testing procedures shall include, but not be limited to, Medi-Cal trend analysis, provider profiling data, provider and beneficiary history data, or appropriateness of the services as related to diagnosis, volume of services, utilization patterns, and specialty of provider. The existing prior authorization appeals process shall be available to these providers for denial of services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 294, Sec. 72.   Effective August 18, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

14133.15.

(a) The provision of services to beneficiaries eligible for medical assistance benefits may be subject to utilization controls, as provided for in Section 50793 of Title 22 of the California Administrative Code as the section existed on January 1, 1984, when the director finds that the utilization controls are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(b) Where the director determines that a recipient has been abusing drugs or services, the recipient may, in order to prevent his or her abuse, be placed on utilization controls for a maximum period of two
 years, which may be extended for an additional period upon a determination by the director that the potential for abuse still exists after notice and hearing, as set forth in subdivisions (f) and (g).
